New York, session 2025-2026, A1526.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The public housing law is amended by adding a new section 2 14-a to read as follows: 3 § 14-a. Penalties for non-compliance. Any landlord or owner of a 4 multiple dwelling who fails to comply with any order by the division of 5 housing shall be subject to a fine of not more than five thousand 6 dollars for each instance of non-compliance. 7 § 2. Title 26 of the administrative code of the city of New York is 8 amended by adding a new chapter 1 to read as follows: 9 CHAPTER 1 10 MISCELLANEOUS 11 Section 26-101 Penalties for non-compliance. 12 § 26-101 Penalties for non-compliance. 1. Any owner of a dwelling unit 13 who fails to comply with any order by the division of housing and commu- 14 nity renewal shall be subject to a fine of not more than five thousand 15 dollars for each instance of non-compliance. 16 2. For purposes of this section: 17 (a) the term "owner" shall mean and include the owner or owners of the 18 freehold of the premises or lesser estate therein, a mortgagee or vendee 19 in possession, assignee of rents, receiver, executor, trustee, lessee, 20 agent, or any other person, firm or corporation, directly or indirectly 21 in control of a dwelling; and 22 (b) the term "dwelling unit" shall mean any residential accommodation 23 in a multiple dwelling or private dwelling. 24 § 3. This act shall take effect on the sixtieth day after it shall 25 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04439-01-5